Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2526
Bidding procedures.

If all participating public agencies are of the same type, the bidding procedures for that type of public agency apply to the joint public agency. If the participating public agencies are not all of the same type, the bidding requirements set out in the County Purchasing Act apply to the joint public agency.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 26.

County Purchasing Act, see section 23-3101.